Utah statutes.
34-36-1.   Motor vehicles of employers -- Safe maintenance and operation.

Every motor vehicle furnished by an employer to be used to transport one or more workers to and from their places of employment shall be maintained in a safe condition and operated in a safe manner at all times, whether or not used on a public highway.

